Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.812

Service credit for half-time employment from October 1, 1977, through December 31, 1986.

The department of retirement systems shall credit at least one-half service credit month for each month of each school year, as defined by *RCW 28A.150.040, from October 1, 1977, through December 31, 1986, to a member of the teachers' retirement system plan 2 who was employed by an employer, as defined by RCW 41.32.010, under a contract for half-time employment as determined by the department for such school year and from whose compensation contributions were paid by the employee or picked up by the employer. Any withdrawn contributions shall be restored under **RCW 41.32.500(1) or 41.50.165 prior to crediting any service.

[ 1994 c 197 s 21; 1992 c 212 s 20; 1991 c 343 s 12.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28A.150.040 was repealed by 2009 c 548 s 710, effective September 1, 2011.

**(2) RCW 41.32.500(1) was renumbered by 1994 c 197 s 17 and deleted in large part by 1994 c 177 s 5.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Findings—Effective dates—1991 c 343: See notes following RCW 41.50.005.